Washington statutes.
RCW 15.140.060

Hemp producer license—Hemp processor registration—Rules—Fees.

(1) The department must issue hemp producer licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter and the agriculture improvement act of 2018. The department may adopt rules pursuant to this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to license persons to grow hemp under a commercial hemp program. The department may adopt rules pursuant to this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to register hemp processors.

(2) A hemp processor that processes hemp for commercial use or sale may register with the department. The registration application must include the physical address of all locations where hemp is processed or stored, a registration fee as set in rule, and any other information required by the department by rule. A registered hemp processor is not required to obtain a hemp producer license. A registered hemp processor must be a registered business entity in Washington state or a foreign entity compliant with state laws.

(3) The plan must identify qualifications for license applicants, to include adults and corporate persons and to exclude persons with felony convictions as required under the agriculture improvement act of 2018.

(4) The department must establish license fees in an amount that will fund the implementation of this chapter and sustain the hemp program. The department may adopt rules establishing fees for tetrahydrocannabinol testing, inspections, and additional services required by the United States department of agriculture. License fees and any money received by the department under this chapter must be deposited in the hemp regulatory account created in RCW 15.140.080.

[ 2021 c 104 s 3; 2019 c 158 s 6.]

NOTES:

Intent—2021 c 104: See note following RCW 15.140.020.